Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.400

Demand by governor of this state for extradition—Warrant—Agent.

Whenever the governor of this state shall demand a person charged with crime or with escaping from confinement or breaking the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole in this state, from the executive authority of any other state, or from the appropriate authority of the District of Columbia authorized to receive such demand under the laws of the United States, he or she shall issue a warrant under the seal of this state, to some agent, commanding him or her to receive the person so charged if delivered to him or her and convey him or her to the proper officer of the county in this state in which the offense was committed.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1083; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 21.]